District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.01

General conditions.

(a)

An ALR shall meet applicable zoning, building, housing, sewer, water, fire prevention codes, rules, and regulations of the District of Columbia.

(b)

An ALR shall maintain all structures, installed equipment, grounds, and individual living units in good repair and operable.

(c)

An ALR may be classified as a residential occupancy and may be located in a single or multi-family dwelling.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1001, 47 DCR 2647